Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 714.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. For the purpose of obtaining employment or other personal gain, knowingly and with intent falsely represents oneself as possessing an academic degree or academic credentials. NEW SUBSECTION . 6B. For the purpose of obtaining employment or other personal gain, knowingly and with intent falsely represents oneself as possessing a professional or occupational license regulated under chapter 272C. Sec. 2. Section 714.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. A fraudulent practice as set forth in section 714.8, subsection 6B. Sec. 3. Section 714.13, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. Fraudulent practice in the fifth degree is a any of the following: a. A fraudulent practice where for which the amount of money or value of property or services involved does not exceed three hundred dollars. House File 2337, p. 2 b. A fraudulent practice as set forth in section 714.8, subsection 6A. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2337, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor